Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.190

Bonding requirements for officers and employees.

All officers and employees of an office shall be subject to the same bonding requirements as are officers and employees of banks incorporated under the laws of this state.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 19. Formerly RCW 30.42.190.]